Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 85.80 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. a. “Personal pronouns” means a reference to an


individual’s sex or gender and shall include but not


be limited to:


(1) he,


(2) him,


(3) she,


(4) her,


(5) they,

Req. No. 3494 Page 1


(6) them, and


(7) any non-standard term used as a replacement for


the pronouns listed in paragraphs 1 through 6 of


this subsection.


b. For the purposes of this section, pronouns shall not


include the terms “Mr.”, “Mrs.”, “Ms.”, or “Miss”,


unless:


(1) a person who was born a female uses the term


“Mr.” to refer to herself, or


(2) a person who was born a male uses the term


“Mrs.”, “Ms.”, or “Miss” to refer to himself.


Such usage as provided in subparagraphs a and b of this


paragraph shall constitute a violation of the provisions of


subsection C of this section; and


2. “Preferred pronouns” means a statement or listing of


personal pronouns an individual uses to refer to himself or herself.


B. No employee, appointee, or contractor of this state, or any


agency or political subdivision of such, shall state his or her


preferred pronouns in any form of official communication, whether


physical or digital. Such communication shall include but not be


limited to:


1. Text messages;


2. Electronic mail;


3. Letters; or

Req. No. 3494 Page 2


4. Faxes.


C. Any employee, appointee, or contractor of this state, or any


agency or political subdivision of such, that violates the


provisions of subsection B of this section shall be issued a


warning, either verbally or in writing, for the first violation. A


subsequent violation shall constitute immediate grounds for the


removal of the employee or appointee, or termination of the contract


with such contractor.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3494 MSBB 1/14/2026 6:04:48 PM



















Req. No. 3494 Page 3